North Dakota statutes. TITLE 19 Foods, Drugs, Oils, and Compounds
CHAPTER 19-20.2 Anhydrous Ammonia Facilities [Repealed]

19-20.2-01.
Anhydrous ammonia safety rules. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 1; 1991, ch. 229, § 1; 1995, ch. 223, § 2; 1997, ch. 209, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-01.1.
Definition. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 223, § 1; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-02.
License required — Existing anhydrous ammonia storage facilities. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 2; 1995, ch. 223, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-03.
License required — Anhydrous ammonia facilities constructed after June 30, 1985. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 3; 1995, ch. 223, § 4; 2003, ch. 190, § 1; 2011, ch. 168, § 2; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-04.
State license fee. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 4; 1995, ch. 223, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-05.
State siting requirements — Anhydrous ammonia storage facilities constructed after June 30, 1985. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 5; 1995, ch. 223, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-06.
Transfer hose requirements. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 6; 1989, ch. 273, § 1; 1995, ch. 223, § 7; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-06.1.
Pressure relief devices. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 223, § 8; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-07.
Inspection. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 7; 1995, ch. 223, § 9; 2011, ch. 168, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-07.1.
Reinstalled and secondhand anhydrous ammonia storage containers — Requirement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 209, § 2; 2011, ch. 168, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-08.
Promotion of safety — Use of excess fees. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 8; 1995, ch. 223, § 10; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-08.1.
Anhydrous ammonia storage facility inspection fund. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 2011, ch. 168, § 9.

19-20.2-08.2.
Prohibitions. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1995, ch. 223, § 12; 1997, ch. 209, § 3; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-08.3.
Anhydrous ammonia — Bulk delivery. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 209, § 4; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-08.4.
Hydrostatic test procedures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 209, § 5; 2011, ch. 168, § 5; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-08.5.
Wet fluorescent magnetic particle test procedures. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 209, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-09.
Enforcement. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 9; 1995, ch. 223, § 13; 2011, ch. 168, § 6; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-10.
Penalty. [Repealed]

Source:

S.L. 1985, ch. 269, § 10; 1995, ch. 223, § 14; repealed by 2017, ch. 67, § 13, effective July 1, 2017.

19-20.2-11.
Rules relating to security measures for nurse tanks. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.LS.L. 2013, ch. 187, § 18.